Florida, session 2026, HB1323.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 351.38, Florida Statutes, is created to
read:
351.38 Railroad crossing safety technology study.—
(1) The Legislature finds that improving safety at
railroad crossings is critical to protecting the lives of
pedestrians, motorists, railway workers, and the general public.
Advanced detection and monitoring systems utilizing technologies
such as sensors, high-resolution cameras, and data analytics may
provide a reliable means to enhance situational awareness and
reduce collisions at railroad crossings. The Legislature further
finds that additional analysis is necessary to evaluate the
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1323-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 1323 2026
effectiveness, feasibility, costs, and implementation of such
systems. It is the intent of the Legislature to direct the
Department of Transportation to study these technologies before
considering any statewide requirements for their deployment.
(2) As used in this section, the term:
(a) "Advanced detection and monitoring system" means a
system capable of detecting and classifying objects such as
pedestrians, vehicles, or other obstructions at or approaching a
railroad crossing using technologies including, but not limited
to, sensors, high-resolution cameras, and data analytics.
(b) "Public railroad-highway grade crossing" has the same
meaning as in s. 335.141(1)(b).
(3) The Department of Transportation shall conduct a
statewide study on the potential use of advanced detection and
monitoring systems at public railroad-highway grade crossings in
this state. The study must include, but is not limited to, an
analysis of:
(a) Available and emerging advanced detection and
monitoring technologies applicable to railroad crossings.
(b) The effectiveness of such technologies in improving
safety outcomes, including collision prevention and hazard
mitigation, based on available data from pilot programs,
deployments in other jurisdictions, or academic research.
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1323-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 1323 2026
(c) Technical and operational considerations, including
interoperability with existing railroad safety systems and
operating protocols.
(d) Costs associated with the deployment of advanced
detection and monitoring systems, including installation,
operation, maintenance, and long-term lifecycle costs.
(e) Potential funding mechanisms, including federal funds,
state funds, grants, or public-private partnerships.
(f) Criteria for identifying higher-risk railroad
crossings where such technologies may provide the greatest
safety benefit.
(g) Legal, regulatory, and operational considerations
related to the deployment and oversight of advanced detection
and monitoring systems.
(h) The respective roles of this state, local governments,
and railroad owners in the potential implementation of such
systems.
(4) In conducting the study, the Department of
Transportation shall consult with, as appropriate:
(a) Railroad owners and railroad industry representatives.
(b) Local governments with jurisdiction over public
railroad-highway grade crossings.
(c) Transportation safety experts and academic
institutions.
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1323-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 1323 2026
(d) Federal agencies or national organizations with
expertise in railroad safety.
(5) By December 1, 2026, the Department of Transportation
shall submit a report of its findings and any recommendations to
the Governor, the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of
the House of Representatives. The report may include potential
policy options for legislative consideration but may not
recommend mandatory installation or upgrade of railroad
crossings.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1323-01-c1